src/morphology/hacks/tagger-hacks.lexc
[WORD_ID=yritystenvälinen][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:0yritystenvälinen	#	;
[WORD_ID=yritystenvälisen][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=GEN]:0yritystenvälisen	#	;
[WORD_ID=yritystenvälisten][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:0yritystenvälisten	#	;
[WORD_ID=yöpyville][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ALL]:0yöpyville	#	;
[WORD_ID=yöpyviä][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:0yöpyviä	#	;
[WORD_ID=äänesmäistä][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=PAR]:0äänesmäistä	#	;
[WORD_ID=äänestettäviin][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ILL]:0äänestettäviin	#	;
[WORD_ID=äänestävien][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:0äänestävien	#	;
[WORD_ID=äänestävillä][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ADE]:0äänestävillä	#	;
[WORD_ID=äänestäviltä][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ABL]:0äänestäviltä	#	;
[WORD_ID=äänestävistä][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ELA]:0äänestävistä	#	;
[WORD_ID=äänestäviä][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:0äänestäviä	#	;
[WORD_ID=äänipohjainen][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:0äänipohjainen	#	;
[WORD_ID=äärisivupisteisiin][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ILL]:0äärisivupisteisiin	#	;
[WORD_ID=öljyperäiset][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=NOM]:0öljyperäiset	#	;
[WORD_ID=öljysiemenistä][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=PAR]:0öljysiemenistä	#	;
